Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2978.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin (a) $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Community Action Partnership of Hennepin County. These are onetime appropriations. new text end new text begin (b) Of the amount appropriated in paragraph (a): new text end new text begin (1) $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 in fiscal year 2027 are for grants to 21 Days of Peace for social equity building and community engagement activities; and new text end new text begin (2) $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 in fiscal year 2027 are for grants to A Mother's Love for community outreach, empowerment training, and employment and career exploration services for middle school-aged youth to adults, including wraparound services necessary to engage participants and reduce barriers to entry for potential participants in these activities. new text end